Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-756
Bonds; petition; contents.

The board of trustees or the administrator of the district or such holder or holders of any bond or bonds of the district shall file in the district court for the county in which the lands of the district, or the greater portion thereof, are situated, a petition praying in effect that the proceedings aforesaid may be examined, approved, and confirmed by the court. The petition shall state the facts showing the proceedings had for the issuance and sale of the bonds, and shall state generally that the sanitary and improvement district was duly organized, and that the first board of trustees was duly elected. The petition need not state the facts showing such organization of the district or the appointment of the first board of trustees but shall state the facts relevant to the appointment of the administrator.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 30, p. 207;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 24.